Washington statutes.
RCW 19.210.040

Penalties.

(1) A first violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(2) A second violation of this chapter within five years is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A third or subsequent violation of this chapter within five years is a class C felony.

[ 2001 c 160 s 4.]